Utah statutes.
35A-8-415.   Projects subject to local building regulations.

A project of an authority is subject to the planning, zoning, sanitary, and building laws, ordinances, and regulations applicable to the locality in which the project is situated.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session

